Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.150

Dissolution, forfeiture of corporate franchise for violations.

Upon petition by the attorney general, the court may, in its discretion, order the dissolution, or suspension or forfeiture of franchise, of any corporation which shall violate RCW 19.86.030 or 19.86.040 or the terms of any injunction issued as in this chapter provided.

[ 1961 c 216 s 15.]